Massachusetts, session 194th, S1062.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 53 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1-2, the words “Common night
walkers, common street walkers, both male and female,”.
SECTION 2. Section 62 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Chapter 94C is hereby amended by inserting after section 34A the
following section:-
Section 34B: Any person who, in good faith, reports a crime shall not be charged or
prosecuted for (i) possession of a controlled substance under section 34, (ii) sex for fee under
subsection (a) and subsection (b) of section 53A of chapter 272, or found in violation of a
condition of probation or pretrial release as determined by a court or a condition of parole, as
of 2

determined by the parole board if the evidence for the above enumerated offenses was gained as
a result of reporting a crime.
of 2